California statutes. Penal Code
(2) (A) A defendant who does not wish to be personally present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken
 may make an oral waiver in open court prior to the proceeding or may submit a written request to the court, which the court may grant in its discretion. The court may, when a defendant has waived the right to be personally present, require a defendant held in any state, county, or local facility within the county on felony or misdemeanor charges to be present for noncritical portions of the trial when no testimonial evidence is taken, including, but not limited to, confirmation of the preliminary hearing, status conferences, trial readiness conferences, discovery motions, receipt of records, the setting of the trial date, a motion to vacate the trial date, and motions in limine, by two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the defendant and the courtroom in lieu of the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall not be required to be personally present with the defendant for noncritical portions of the trial, if the audiovideo
 conferencing system or other technology allows for private communication between the defendant and the attorney prior to and during the noncritical portion of trial. Any private communication shall be confidential and privileged pursuant to Section 952 of the Evidence Code.

(B) This paragraph does not expand or limit the right of a defendant to be personally present with their counsel at a particular proceeding as required by Section 15 of Article 1 of the California Constitution.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the court may allow a defendant to appear by counsel on that day, at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding, with or without a written waiver, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following to be true:

(A) The defendant is in
 custody and is refusing, without good cause, to appear in court on that day for that trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(B) The defendant has been informed of their right and obligation to be personally present in court.

(C) The defendant has been informed that the trial, hearing, or other proceeding will proceed without the defendant being present.

(D) The defendant has been informed that they have the right to remain silent during the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(E) The defendant has been informed that their absence without good cause will constitute a voluntary waiver of any constitutional or statutory right to confront any witnesses against them or to testify on their own behalf.

(F) The defendant has been informed whether or not defense counsel will be present.

(2) The court shall state on the record the reasons for the court’s findings and shall cause those findings and reasons to be entered into the minutes.

(3) If the trial, hearing, or other proceeding lasts for more than one day, the court is required to make the findings required by this subdivision anew for each day that the defendant is absent.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in which the defendant was personally present in court at the commencement of the trial, hearing, or other proceeding.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2032.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 51, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 7.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

977.1.

The resolution of questions of fact or issues of law by trial or hearing which can be made without the assistance or participation of the defendant is not prohibited by the existence of any pending proceeding to determine whether the defendant is or remains mentally incompetent or gravely disabled pursuant to the provisions of either this code or the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1511.)
-------------------------------------------

977.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 977 or any other law, in any case in which the defendant is charged with a misdemeanor or a felony and is currently incarcerated in the state prison, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may arrange for all court appearances in superior court, except for the preliminary hearing and trial, to be conducted by two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the defendant and the courtroom in lieu of the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. If the defendant agrees, the preliminary hearing and trial may be held by two-way electronic audiovideo communication. This section shall not be interpreted to eliminate the authority of the court to issue an order
 requiring the defendant to be physically present in the courtroom in those cases where the court finds circumstances that require the physical presence of the defendant in the courtroom. For those court appearances that are conducted by two-way electronic audiovideo communication, the department shall arrange for two-way electronic audiovideo communication between the superior court and any state prison facility. The department shall provide properly maintained equipment, adequately trained staff at the prison, and appropriate training for court staff to ensure that consistently effective two-way electronic audiovideo communication is provided between the prison facility and the courtroom for all appearances conducted by two-way electronic audiovideo communication.

(b) If the defendant is represented by counsel, the attorney shall be
 present with the defendant at the initial court appearance and arraignment, and may enter a plea during the arraignment. However, if the defendant is represented by counsel at an arraignment on an information or indictment in a felony case, and if the defendant does not plead guilty or nolo contendere to any charge, the attorney shall be present with the defendant or if the attorney is not present with the defendant, the attorney shall be present in court during the hearing.

(c) In lieu of the physical presence of the defendant’s counsel at the institution with the defendant, the court and the department shall establish a confidential telephone line between the court and the institution for communication between the defendant’s counsel in court and the defendant at the institution. In this case, counsel for the defendant shall not be
 required to be physically present at the institution during any court appearance that is conducted via electronic audiovideo communication. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the physical presence of the defense counsel with the defendant at the state prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 13.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

977.3.

(a) A witness may testify in any misdemeanor or felony criminal proceeding, except for felony trials, through the use of remote technology with the written or oral consent of the parties on the record and with the consent of the court. The defendant shall waive the right to have a witness testify in person on the record and may withdraw this waiver at any time upon finding of good cause.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the court may allow a witness to testify through the use of remote technology as otherwise provided by statutes regarding the examination of victims of sexual crimes and conditional examinations of witnesses.

(c) The court shall make findings on the record that any waiver
 entered into pursuant to this section is knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently made by the defendant.

(d) A written waiver of a witness’s physical presence at a misdemeanor jury trial shall be substantially in the following form:

“Waiver of a Witness’s Physical Presence at Misdemeanor Jury Trials”

“The undersigned defendant, having been advised of their right to have [name of witness] be physically present at a misdemeanor jury trial, hereby knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waives the right to have [name of witness] be physically present at the misdemeanor jury trial. The undersigned defendant may withdraw this consent at any time upon a finding of good cause. Good cause to withdraw consent is satisfied when the quality of the technology or audibility at the misdemeanor jury trial inhibits the court reporter’s ability to accurately prepare and
 certify a transcript of the proceeding.”

(e) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules and standards that are necessary to implement the policies and provisions of this section and the intent of the Legislature.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 29, Sec. 8.   (SB 174)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

978.

When his personal appearance is necessary, if he is in custody, the Court may direct and the officer in whose custody he is must bring him before it to be arraigned.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

978.5.

(a) A bench warrant of arrest may be issued when a defendant fails to appear in court as required by law, including, but not limited to, the following situations:

(1) If the defendant is ordered by a judge or magistrate to personally appear in court at a specific time and place.

(2) If the defendant is released from custody on bail and is ordered by a judge or magistrate, or other person authorized to accept bail, to
 personally appear in court at a specific time and place.

(3) If the defendant is released from custody on their own recognizance and promises to personally appear in court at a specific time and place.

(4) If the defendant is released from custody or arrest upon citation by a peace officer or other person authorized to issue citations and the defendant has signed a promise to personally appear in court at a specific time and place.

(5) If a defendant is authorized to appear by counsel and the court or magistrate orders that the defendant personally appear in court at a specific time and place.

(6) If an information or indictment has been filed in the superior court and the court has fixed the date and place for the defendant personally to appear for arraignment.

(b) The bench warrant may be served in any county in the same manner as a warrant of arrest.

(c) This section shall become operative January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 856, Sec. 4.   (AB 2294)   Effective September 30, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

979.

If the defendant has been discharged on bail or has deposited money or other property instead thereof, and does not appear to be arraigned when his personal presence is necessary, the court, in addition to the forfeiture of the undertaking of bail or of the money or other property deposited, may order the issuance of a bench warrant for his arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

980.

(a) At any time after the order for a bench warrant is made, whether the court is sitting or not, the clerk may issue a bench warrant to one or more counties.

(b) The clerk shall require the appropriate agency to enter each bench warrant issued on a private surety-bonded felony case into the national warrant system (National Crime Information Center (NCIC)). If the appropriate agency fails to enter the bench warrant into the national warrant system (NCIC), and the court finds that
 this failure prevented the surety or bond agent from surrendering the fugitive into custody, prevented the fugitive from being arrested or taken into custody, or resulted in the fugitive’s subsequent release from custody, the court having jurisdiction over the bail shall, upon petition, set aside the forfeiture of the bond and declare all liability on the bail bond to be exonerated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 520, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

981.

The bench warrant must be substantially in the following form:

County of ____. The People of the State of California to any Sheriff, Marshal, or Policeman in this State: An accusatory pleading having been filed on the ____ day of ____, A.D. ____, in the Superior Court of the County of ____, charging C.D. with the crime of ____ (designating it generally); you are, therefore, commanded forthwith to arrest the above named C.D., and bring him or her before that Court (or if the
 accusatory pleading has been sent to another Court, then before that Court, naming it), to answer said accusatory pleading, or if the Court is not in session, that you deliver him or her into the custody of the Sheriff of the County of ____.

Given under my hand, with the seal of said Court affixed, this ____ day of ____, A.D.____.

By order of said Court.[seal.]E.F., Clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 468, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

982.

The defendant, when arrested under a warrant for an offense not bailable, must be held in custody by the Sheriff of the county in which the indictment is found or information filed, unless admitted to bail after an examination upon a writ of habeas corpus; but if the offense is bailable, there must be added to the body of the bench warrant a direction to the following effect: “Or, if he requires it, that you take him before any magistrate in that county, or in the county in which you arrest him, that he may give bail to answer to the indictment (or information);” and the Court, upon directing it to issue, must fix the amount of bail, and an indorsement must be made thereon and
 signed by the Clerk, to the following effect: “The defendant is to be admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars.”

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

983.

The bench warrant may be served in any county in the same manner as a warrant of arrest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

984.

If the defendant is brought before a magistrate of another county for the purpose of giving bail, the magistrate must proceed in respect thereto in the same manner as if the defendant had been brought before him upon a warrant of arrest, and the same proceedings must be had thereon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

985.

When the information or indictment is for a felony, and the defendant, before the filing thereof, has given bail for his appearance to answer the charge, the Court to which the indictment or information is presented, or in which it is pending, may order the defendant to be committed to actual custody, unless he gives bail in an increased amount, to be specified in the order.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

986.

If the defendant is present when the order is made, he must be forthwith committed. If he is not present, a bench warrant must be issued and proceeded upon in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

987.

(a) In a noncapital case, if the defendant appears for arraignment without counsel, the defendant shall be informed by the court that it is their right to have counsel before being arraigned, and shall be asked if they desire the assistance of counsel. If the defendant desires and is unable to employ counsel the court shall assign counsel to defend them.

(b) In a capital case, if the defendant appears for arraignment without counsel, the court shall inform the defendant that they shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the preliminary and trial proceedings and that the representation is at their expense if they are able to employ counsel or at public expense if they are unable to employ counsel, inquire of them whether they are able to
 employ counsel and, if so, whether they desire to employ counsel of their choice or to have counsel assigned, and allow them a reasonable time to send for their chosen or assigned counsel. If the defendant is unable to employ counsel, the court shall assign counsel to defend them. If the defendant is able to employ counsel and either refuses to employ counsel or appears without counsel after having had a reasonable time to employ counsel, the court shall assign counsel.

The court shall at the first opportunity inform the defendant’s trial counsel, whether retained by the defendant or court-appointed, of the additional duties imposed upon trial counsel in any capital case as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1240.1.

(c) In order to assist the court in determining whether a defendant is able to employ counsel in any case, the court may require a defendant to file a financial
 statement or other financial information under penalty of perjury with the court or, in its discretion, order a defendant to appear before a county officer designated by the court to make an inquiry into the ability of the defendant to employ their own counsel. If a county officer is designated, the county officer shall provide to the court a written recommendation and the reason or reasons in support of the recommendation. The determination by the court shall be made on the record. Except as provided in Section 1214, the financial statement or other financial information obtained from the defendant shall be confidential and privileged and shall not be admissible in evidence in any criminal proceeding except the prosecution of an alleged offense of perjury based upon false material contained in the financial statement. The financial statement shall be made available to the prosecution only for purposes of investigation of an alleged offense of perjury based upon false material contained in the financial
 statement at the conclusion of the proceedings for which the financial statement was required to be submitted.

(d) In a capital case, the court may appoint an additional attorney as a cocounsel upon a written request of the first attorney appointed. The request shall be supported by an affidavit of the first attorney setting forth in detail the reasons why a second attorney should be appointed. Any affidavit filed with the court shall be confidential and privileged. The court shall appoint a second attorney when it is convinced by the reasons stated in the affidavit that the appointment is necessary to provide the defendant with effective representation. If the request is denied, the court shall state on the record its reasons for denial of the request.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 32.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

987.05.

In assigning defense counsel in felony cases, whether it is the public defender or private counsel, the court shall only assign counsel who represents, on the record, that he or she will be ready to proceed with the preliminary hearing or trial, as the case may be, within the time provisions prescribed in this code for preliminary hearings and trials, except in those unusual cases where the court finds that, due to the nature of the case, counsel cannot reasonably be expected to be ready within the presecribed period if he or she were to begin preparing the case forthwith and continue to make
 diligent and constant efforts to be ready. In the case where the time of preparation for preliminary hearing or trial is deemed greater than the statutory time, the court shall set a reasonable time period for preparation. In making this determination, the court shall not consider counsel’s convenience, counsel’s calendar conflicts, or counsel’s other business. The court may allow counsel a reasonable time to become familiar with the case in order to determine whether he or she can be ready. In cases where counsel, after making representations that he or she will be ready for preliminary examination or trial, and without good cause is not ready on the date set, the court may relieve counsel from the case and may impose sanctions upon counsel, including, but not limited to, finding the assigned counsel in contempt of court, imposing a fine, or denying any public funds as compensation for counsel’s services. Both the prosecuting attorney and defense counsel shall have a right to present evidence and argument
 as to a reasonable length of time for preparation and on any reasons why counsel could not be prepared in the set time.

(History: Added June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

987.1.

Counsel at the preliminary examination shall continue to represent a defendant who has been ordered to stand trial for a felony until the date set for arraignment on the information unless relieved by the court upon the substitution of other counsel or for cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 377.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

987.2.

(a) In any case in which a person, including a person who is a minor, desires but is unable to employ counsel, and in which counsel is assigned in the superior court to represent the person in a criminal trial, proceeding, or appeal, the following assigned counsel shall receive a reasonable sum for compensation and for necessary expenses, the amount of which shall be determined by the court, to be paid out of the general fund of the county:

(1) In a county or city and county in which there is no public defender.

(2) In a county of the first, second, or third class where there is no contract for criminal defense services between the county and one or more responsible
 attorneys.

(3) In a case in which the court finds that, because of a conflict of interest or other reasons, the public defender has properly refused.

(4) In a county of the first, second, or third class where attorneys contracted by the county are unable to represent the person accused.

(b) The sum provided for in subdivision (a) may be determined by contract between the court and one or more responsible attorneys after consultation with the board of supervisors as to the total amount of compensation and expenses to be paid, which shall be within the amount of funds allocated by the board of supervisors for the cost of assigned counsel in those cases.

(c) In counties that utilize an assigned private counsel system as either the primary method of public
 defense or as the method of appointing counsel in cases where the public defender is unavailable, the county, the courts, or the local county bar association working with the courts are encouraged to do all of the following:

(1) Establish panels that shall be open to members of the State Bar of California.

(2) Categorize attorneys for panel placement on the basis of experience.

(3) Refer cases to panel members on a rotational basis within the level of experience of each panel, except that a judge may exclude an individual attorney from appointment to an individual case for good cause.

(4) Seek to educate those panel members through an approved training program.

(d) In a county of the
 first, second, or third class, the court shall first utilize the services of the public defender to provide criminal defense services for indigent defendants. In the event that the public defender is unavailable and the county and the courts have contracted with one or more responsible attorneys or with a panel of attorneys to provide criminal defense services for indigent defendants, the court shall utilize the services of the county-contracted attorneys prior to assigning any other private counsel. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the appointment of counsel in any case in which the counsel has a conflict of interest. In the interest of justice, a court may depart from that portion of the procedure requiring appointment of a county-contracted attorney after making a finding of good cause and stating the reasons therefor on the record.

(e) In a county of the first, second, or third class, the court shall first utilize
 the services of the public defender to provide criminal defense services for indigent defendants. In the event that the public defender is unavailable and the county has created a second public defender and contracted with one or more responsible attorneys or with a panel of attorneys to provide criminal defense services for indigent defendants, and if the quality of representation provided by the second public defender is comparable to the quality of representation provided by the public defender, the court shall next utilize the services of the second public defender and then the services of the county-contracted attorneys prior to assigning any other private counsel. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require the appointment of counsel in any case in which the counsel has a conflict of interest. In the interest of justice, a court may depart from that portion of the procedure requiring appointment of the second public defender or a county-contracted attorney after making a finding of good
 cause and stating the reasons therefor on the record.

(f) In any case in which counsel is assigned as provided in subdivision (a), that counsel appointed by the court and any court-appointed licensed private investigator shall have the same rights and privileges to information as the public defender and the public defender investigator. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to equalize any disparity that exists between the ability of private, court-appointed counsel and investigators, and public defenders and public defender investigators, to represent their clients. This subdivision is not intended to grant to private investigators access to any confidential Department of Motor Vehicles’ information not otherwise available to them. This subdivision is not intended to extend to private investigators the right to issue subpoenas.

(g) Notwithstanding any
 other provision of this section, where an indigent defendant is first charged in one county and establishes an attorney-client relationship with the public defender, defense services contract attorney, or private attorney, and where the defendant is then charged with an offense in a second or subsequent county, the court in the second or subsequent county may appoint the same counsel as was appointed in the first county to represent the defendant when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The offense charged in the second or subsequent county would be joinable for trial with the offense charged in the first if it took place in the same county, or involves evidence which would be cross-admissible.

(2) The court finds that the interests of justice and economy will be best served by unitary representation.

(3) Counsel appointed in the first county consents to the appointment.

(h) The county may recover costs of public defender services under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 4750) of Title 5 of Part 3 for any case subject to Section 4750.

(i) Counsel shall be appointed to represent, in a misdemeanor case, a person who desires but is unable to employ counsel, when it appears that the appointment is necessary to provide an adequate and effective defense for the defendant. Appointment of counsel in an infraction case is governed by Section 19.6.

(j) As used in this section, “county of the first, second, or third class” means the county of the first class, county of the second class, and county of the third class as provided by Sections 28020, 28022, 28023, and 28024 of the Government Code.

(k) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 34.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

987.3.

Whenever in this code a court-appointed attorney is entitled to reasonable compensation and necessary expenses, the judge of the court shall consider the following factors, no one of which alone shall be controlling:

(a) Customary fee in the community for similar services rendered by privately retained counsel to a nonindigent client.

(b) The time and labor required to be spent by the attorney.

(c) The difficulty of the defense.

(d) The novelty or uncertainty of the law upon which the decision depended.

(e) The degree of professional ability, skill, and experience called for and exercised in the performance of the services.

(f) The professional character, qualification, and standing of the attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

987.6.

(a) From any state moneys made available to it for such purpose, the Department of Finance shall, pursuant to this section, pay to the counties an amount not to exceed 10 percent of the amounts actually expended by the counties in providing counsel in accordance with the law whether by public defender, assigned counsel, or both, for persons charged with violations of state criminal law or involuntarily detained under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act, Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, who desire, but are unable to afford, counsel.

(b) Application for
 payment shall be made in such manner and at such times as prescribed by the Department of Finance and the department may adopt rules necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 987b by Stats. 1970, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

987.9.

(a) In the trial of a capital case or a case under subdivision (a) of Section 190.05, the indigent defendant, through the defendant’s counsel, may request the court for funds for the specific payment of investigators, experts, and others for the preparation or presentation of the defense. The application for funds shall be by affidavit and shall specify that the funds are reasonably necessary for the preparation or presentation of the defense. The fact that an application has been made shall be confidential and the contents of the application shall be confidential. Upon receipt of an application, a judge of the court, other than the trial judge presiding over the case in question, shall rule on the reasonableness of the request and shall disburse an appropriate amount of money to the defendant’s attorney. The ruling on the
 reasonableness of the request shall be made at an in camera hearing. In making the ruling, the court shall be guided by the need to provide a complete and full defense for the defendant.

(b) (1) The Controller shall not reimburse any county for costs that exceed Department of General Services’ standards for travel and per diem expenses. The Controller may reimburse extraordinary costs in unusual cases if the county provides sufficient documentation of the need for those expenditures.

(2) At the termination of the proceedings, the attorney shall furnish to the court a complete accounting of all moneys received and disbursed pursuant to this section.

(c) The Controller shall adopt regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, controlling reimbursements under this section. The regulations shall consider compensation for investigators, expert witnesses, and other expenses that may or may not be reimbursable pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Controller shall follow any regulations adopted until final approval by the Office of Administrative Law.

(d) The confidentiality provided in this section shall not preclude any court from providing the prosecuting agency representing the state in the proceeding with access to documents protected by this section when the defendant raises an issue on appeal or collateral review
 where the recorded portion of the record, created pursuant to this section, relates to the issue raised. When the defendant raises that
 issue either on appeal or in a collateral review where an order to show cause has issued, the funding records, or relevant portions thereof, shall be provided to the prosecuting agency representing the state in the proceeding at their request. In this case, the documents shall remain under seal and their use shall be limited solely to the pending proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   (AB 2521)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

988.

The arraignment must be made by the court, or by the clerk or prosecuting attorney under its direction, and consists in reading the accusatory pleading to the defendant and delivering to the defendant a true copy thereof, and of the endorsements thereon, if any, including the list of witnesses, and asking the defendant whether the defendant pleads guilty or not guilty to the accusatory pleading; provided, that where the accusatory pleading is a complaint charging a misdemeanor, a copy of the same need not be delivered to any defendant unless requested by the
 defendant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 379.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

989.

When the defendant is arraigned, he must be informed that if the name by which he is prosecuted is not his true name, he must then declare his true name, or be proceeded against by the name in the accusatory pleading. If he gives no other name, the court may proceed accordingly; but if he alleges that another name is his true name, the court must direct an entry thereof in the minutes of the arraignment, and the subsequent proceedings on the accusatory pleading may be had against him by that name, referring also to the name by which he was first charged therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

990.

If on the arraignment, the defendant requires it, the defendant must be allowed a reasonable time to answer, which shall be not less than one day in a felony case and not more than seven days in a misdemeanor or infraction case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 380.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

991.

(a) If the defendant is in custody at the time he appears before the magistrate for arraignment and, if the public offense is a misdemeanor to which the defendant has pleaded not guilty, the magistrate, on motion of counsel for the defendant or the defendant, shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that a public offense has been committed and that the defendant is guilty thereof.

(b) The determination of probable cause shall be made immediately unless the court grants a continuance for good cause not to exceed three court days.

(c) In determining the existence of probable cause, the magistrate shall consider any warrant of arrest with supporting affidavits, and the sworn complaint together with any documents or reports incorporated by reference thereto, which, if based on information and belief, state the basis for such information, or any other documents of similar reliability.

(d) If, after examining these documents, the court determines that there exists probable cause to believe that the defendant has committed the offense charged in the complaint, it shall set the matter for trial.

If the court determines that no such probable cause exists, it shall dismiss the complaint and discharge the defendant.

(e) Within 15 days of the dismissal of a complaint pursuant to this section the prosecution may
 refile the complaint.

A second dismissal pursuant to this section is a bar to any other prosecution for the same offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1379, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

992.

(a) (1) In any case in which the defendant is charged with a felony, the court shall require the defendant to provide a right thumbprint on a form developed for this purpose. Unless the court has obtained the thumbprint at an earlier proceeding, it shall do so at the arraignment on the information or indictment, or upon entry of a guilty or no contest plea under Section 859a. The fingerprint form shall include the name and superior court case number of the defendant, the date, and the printed name, position, and badge or serial number of the court bailiff who imprints the defendant’s thumbprint. In the event the defendant is physically unable to provide a right thumbprint, the defendant shall provide a left thumbprint. In the
 event the defendant is physically unable to provide a left thumbprint, the court shall make a determination as to how the defendant might otherwise provide a suitable identifying characteristic to be imprinted on the judgment of conviction. The clerk shall note on the fingerprint form which digit, if any, of the defendant’s was imprinted thereon. In the event that the defendant is convicted, this fingerprint form shall be attached to the minute order reflecting the defendant’s sentence. The fingerprint form shall be permanently maintained in the superior court file.

(2) This thumbprint or fingerprint shall not be used to create a database. The Judicial Council shall develop a form to implement this section.

(b) In the event that a county implements a countywide policy in which every felony defendant’s photograph and fingerprints are permanently maintained in the superior court
 file, the presiding judge of that county may elect, after consultation with the district attorney, to continue compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 304, Sec. 8.   (SB 428)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

993.

(a) At the arraignment of a defendant who is charged with a felony and who is, or whom the court reasonably deems to be, the sole custodial parent of one or more minor children, the court shall provide the following to the defendant:

(1) Judicial Council Form GC-205, the “Guardianship Pamphlet.”

(2) Information regarding a power of attorney for a minor child.

(3) Information regarding trustline background examinations pertaining to child care providers as provided in Chapter 3.35 (commencing with Section 1596.60) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If the
 defendant states, orally or in writing, at the arraignment that the defendant is a sole custodial parent of one or more minor children, the court may reasonably deem the defendant to be a sole custodial parent of one or more minor children without further investigation. The court may, but is not required to, make that determination on the basis of information other than the defendant’s statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 256, Sec. 9.   (SB 781)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Setting Aside the Indictment or Information [995. - 999a.]

995.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b) of Section 995a, the indictment or information shall be set aside by the court in which the defendant is arraigned, upon his or her motion, in either of the following cases:

(1) If it is an indictment:

(A) Where it is not found, endorsed, and presented as prescribed in this code. 
